Georgia, session 2025_26, SB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 46 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to certification of
private review agents, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"33-46-20.1.
(a) Each insurer that utilizes prior authorization requirements shall implement and
maintain a program that allows for the selective application of reductions in prior
authorization requirements based on the stratification of healthcare providers' performance
and adherence to evidence based medicine. Such program shall promote quality,
S. B. 5
- 1 -

LC 52 0590
affordable healthcare and reduce unnecessary administrative burdens for both the insurer
and the healthcare provider.
(b) Criteria for participation by healthcare providers and the healthcare services included
in the program shall be at the discretion of the insurer; provided, however, that such insurer
shall submit to the department a filing concerning such program. Such filing shall include
a full narrative description of the program, the criteria for participation in the program, a
list of the procedures and services subject to the program, the number of healthcare
providers participating in the program, and any other information deemed necessary by the
department.
(c) No later than July 1, 2026, each insurer that utilizes prior authorization requirements
shall make the filing provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, and such filing
shall be submitted annually in a form and manner provided for by rules and regulations
promulgated by the Commissioner."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall apply to all policies or
contracts issued, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 5
- 2 -